Washington statutes.
RCW 36.40.040

Preliminary budget.

Upon receipt of the estimates the county auditor or chief financial officer designated in a charter county shall prepare the county budget which shall set forth the complete financial program of the county for the ensuing fiscal year, showing the expenditure program and the sources of revenue by which it is to be financed.

The revenue section shall set forth the estimated receipts from sources other than taxation for each office, department, service, or institution for the ensuing fiscal year, the actual receipts for the first six months of the current fiscal year and the actual receipts for the last completed fiscal year, the estimated surplus at the close of the current fiscal year and the amount proposed to be raised by taxation.

The expenditure section shall set forth in comparative and tabular form by offices, departments, services, and institutions the estimated expenditures for the ensuing fiscal year, the appropriations for the current fiscal year, the actual expenditures for the first six months of the current fiscal year including all contracts or other obligations against current appropriations, and the actual expenditures for the last completed fiscal year.

All estimates of receipts and expenditures for the ensuing year shall be fully detailed in the annual budget and shall be classified and segregated according to a standard classification of accounts to be adopted and prescribed by the state auditor after consultation with the Washington state association of counties and the Washington state association of county officials.

The county auditor or chief financial officer designated in a charter county shall set forth separately in the annual budget to be submitted to the county legislative authority the total amount of emergency warrants issued during the preceding fiscal year, together with a statement showing the amount issued for each emergency, and the legislative authority shall include in the annual tax levy, a levy sufficient to raise an amount equal to the total of such warrants: PROVIDED, That the legislative authority may fund the warrants or any part thereof into bonds instead of including them in the budget levy.

[ 2009 c 337 s 8. Prior: 1995 c 301 s 63; 1995 c 194 s 7; 1973 c 39 s 1; prior: 1971 ex.s. c 85 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 252 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.40.040; prior: (i) 1923 c 164 s 2; RRS s 3997-2. (ii) 1925 ex.s. c 143 s 2, part; 1923 c 164 s 6, part; RRS s 3997-6, part.]